California statutes. Civil Code
(f) This section shall not apply to any building which has been designated as historically significant by an appropriate local, state, or federal governmental jurisdiction.

(g) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to any building intended for human habitation which is managed, directly or indirectly, and controlled by the Department of Transportation. This exemption shall not be construed to affect the duty of the Department of Transportation to maintain the premises of these buildings in a safe condition or abrogate any express or implied statement or promise of the Department of Transportation to provide secure premises. Additionally,
this exemption shall not apply to residential dwellings acquired prior to July 1, 1997, by the Department of Transportation to complete construction of state highway routes 710 and 238 and related interchanges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 537, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.4.

The lessor of a building intended for the residential occupation of human beings shall be responsible for installing at least one usable telephone jack and for placing and maintaining the inside telephone wiring in good working order, shall ensure that the inside telephone wiring meets the applicable standards of the most recent California Electrical Code, and shall make any required repairs. The lessor shall not restrict or interfere with access by the telephone utility to its
telephone network facilities up to the demarcation point separating the inside wiring.

“Inside telephone wiring” for purposes of this section, means that portion of the telephone wire that connects the telephone equipment at the customer’s premises to the telephone network at a demarcation point determined by the telephone corporation in accordance with orders of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (SB 745)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.5.

(a) This section shall apply if a person is alleged to have committed abuse or violence against the eligible tenant or the immediate family or household member of the eligible tenant and the person is not a tenant of the same dwelling unit as the eligible tenant.

(b) A landlord shall, at the landlord’s own expense, change the locks of the eligible tenant’s dwelling unit upon written request of the eligible tenant not later than 24 hours after the eligible tenant gives the landlord a form of documentation described in subdivision (d) and shall give the eligible tenant a key to the new locks.

(c) (1) If a landlord fails to change the locks within 24 hours, the
 eligible tenant may change the locks without the landlord’s permission, notwithstanding any provision in the lease to the contrary.

(2) If the eligible tenant changes the locks pursuant to this subdivision, the following shall apply:

(A) No later than 21 days after the eligible tenant changes the locks, the landlord shall reimburse the eligible tenant for the expenses the eligible tenant incurred to change the locks.

(B) The eligible tenant shall do all of the following:

(i) Change the locks in a workmanlike manner with locks of similar or better quality than the original lock.

(ii) Notify the landlord within 24 hours that the locks have been changed.

(iii) Provide the landlord with a key by any reasonable method agreed upon by the landlord and eligible tenant.

(3) This subdivision shall apply to leases executed on or after January 1, 2011.

(d) A written request to change the locks pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include one of the following forms of documentation attached to the request:

(1) A copy of a temporary restraining order, emergency protective order, or protective order lawfully issued pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240), Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300), or Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 10 of the Family Code, Section 136.2 of the Penal Code, Section 527.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or Section 213.5 or
 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code that protects the eligible tenant, household member, or immediate family member from abuse or violence.

(2) A copy of a written report by a peace officer employed by a state or local law enforcement agency acting in the peace officer’s official capacity stating that the tenant, household member, or immediate family member has filed a report alleging that the tenant, the household member, or the immediate family member is a victim of abuse or violence.

(3) (A) Documentation from a qualified third party based on information received by that third party while acting in their professional capacity to indicate that the tenant, the tenant’s immediate family member, or the tenant’s household member is seeking assistance for physical or mental injuries or abuse resulting from an act of abuse or violence, which shall
 contain, in substantially the same form, the following:

Tenant Statement and Qualified Third Party Statement 
under Civil Code Section 1941.5Part I.Statement By Tenant I, [insert name of tenant], state as follows: I, my immediate family member, or a member of my household, have been a victim of:[insert one or more of the following: domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, human trafficking, elder abuse,
 dependent adult abuse, or a crime that caused bodily injury or death, a crime that included the exhibition, drawing, brandishing, or use of a firearm or other deadly weapon or instrument, or a crime that included the use of force against the victim or a threat of force against the victim.] The most recent incident(s) happened on or about:[insert date or dates.] The incident(s) was/were committed by the following person(s), with these physical description(s), if known and safe to provide:[if known and safe to provide, insert name(s) and physical description(s).](signature of tenant)(date) Part II.Qualified Third Party StatementI, [insert name of qualified third party], state as follows: My business address and phone number are:[insert business address and phone number.]Check and complete one of the following:____I meet the requirements for a sexual assault counselor provided in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code and I am either engaged in an office, hospital, institution, or center commonly known as a rape crisis center described in that section or employed by an organization providing the programs specified in Section 13835.2 of the Penal Code.____I meet the requirements for a domestic violence counselor provided in Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code and I am employed, whether financially compensated or not, by a domestic violence victim service organization, as defined in that section.____I meet the requirements for a human trafficking caseworker provided in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code and I am employed, whether financially compensated or not, by an organization that provides programs specified in Section 18294 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or in Section 13835.2 of the Penal Code.____I meet the definition of “victim of violent crime advocate” provided in Section 1946.7 of the Civil Code and I am employed, whether financially compensated or not, by an agency or organization that has a documented record of providing services to victims of violent crime or provides those services under the auspices or supervision of a court or a law enforcement or prosecution agency.____I am licensed by the State of California as a:[insert one of the following: physician
 and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, registered nurse, psychiatrist, psychologist, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, or licensed professional clinical counselor.] and I am licensed by, and my license number is:[insert name of state licensing entity and license number.]The person who signed the Statement By Tenant above stated to me that the person, or a member of their immediate family, or a member of their household, is a victim of:[insert one or more of the following: domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, human trafficking, elder abuse, dependent adult abuse, a crime that caused bodily injury or death, a crime that included the exhibition, drawing, brandishing, or use of a firearm or other deadly
 weapon or instrument, or a crime that included the use or threat of force against the victim.]The person further stated to me the incident(s) occurred on or about the date(s) stated above.(signature of qualified third party)(date)

(B) The documentation may be signed by a person who meets the requirements for a sexual assault counselor, domestic violence counselor, a human trafficking caseworker, or a
 victim of violent crime advocate only if the documentation displays the letterhead of the office, hospital, institution, center, or organization, as appropriate, that engages or employs, whether financially compensated or not, this counselor, caseworker, or advocate.

(4) Any other form of documentation that reasonably verifies that the abuse or violence occurred, including, but not limited to, a signed statement from the eligible tenant.

(e) An eligible tenant satisfies the documentation requirements under subdivision (d) by providing one of the forms of documentation listed in subdivision (d), of the tenant’s choosing.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Abuse or
 violence” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1161.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) “Eligible tenant” means either of the following:

(A) A tenant who is a victim of abuse or violence.

(B) A tenant who has an immediate family member or household member who is a victim of abuse or violence, if the tenant is not alleged to have committed the abuse or violence.

(3) “Health practitioner” means a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, registered nurse, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, or a licensed professional clinical counselor.

(4) “Household member” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 1946.7.

(5) “Immediate family member” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 1946.7.

(6) “Locks” means any exterior lock that provides access to the dwelling. 

(7) “Qualified third party” means a health practitioner, domestic violence counselor, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1037.1 of the Evidence Code, a sexual assault counselor, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code, a human trafficking caseworker, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, or a victim of violent
 crime advocate.

(8) “Tenant” means tenant, subtenant, lessee, or sublessee.

(9) “Victim of violent crime advocate” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1946.7.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   (SB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.6.

(a) This section shall apply if a person who is restrained from contact with a protected tenant under a court order is a tenant of the same dwelling unit as the protected tenant.

(b) A landlord shall, at the landlord’s own expense, change the locks of a protected tenant’s dwelling unit upon written request of the protected tenant not later than 24 hours after the protected tenant gives the landlord a copy of a court order that excludes from the dwelling unit the restrained person referred to in subdivision (a). The landlord shall give the protected tenant a key to the new locks.

(c) (1) If a landlord fails to change the locks within 24 hours, the protected tenant may change the
 locks without the landlord’s permission, notwithstanding any provision in the lease to the contrary.

(2) If the protected tenant changes the locks pursuant to this subdivision, both of the following shall apply:

(A) No later than 21 days after the protected tenant changes the locks, the landlord shall reimburse the protected tenant for the expenses the protected tenant incurred to change the locks.

(B) The protected tenant shall do all of the following:

(i) Change the locks in a workmanlike manner with locks of similar or better quality than the original lock.

(ii) Notify the landlord within 24 hours that the locks have been changed.

(iii) Provide the landlord with a key by any reasonable method agreed upon by the landlord and protected tenant.

(3) This subdivision shall apply to leases executed on or after January 1, 2011.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 789.3, if the locks are changed pursuant to this section, the landlord is not liable to a person excluded from the dwelling unit pursuant to this section.

(e) A person who has been excluded from a dwelling unit under this section remains liable under the lease with all other tenants of the dwelling unit for rent as provided in the lease.

(f) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Court order” means a court order lawfully
 issued within the last 180 days pursuant to Section 527.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure, Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240), Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300), or Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 10 of the Family Code, Section 136.2 of the Penal Code, or Section 213.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) “Locks” means any exterior lock that provides access to the dwelling.

(3) “Protected tenant” means a tenant who has obtained a court order.

(4) “Tenant” means tenant, subtenant, lessee, or sublessee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 75, Sec. 3.   (SB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.7.

(a) An obligation shall not arise under Section 1941 or 1942 to repair a dilapidation relating to the presence of mold pursuant to paragraph (13) of subdivision (a) of Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code until the lessor has notice of the dilapidation or if the tenant is in violation of Section 1941.2.

(b) A landlord may enter a dwelling unit to repair a dilapidation relating to the
presence of mold pursuant to paragraph (13) of subdivision (a) of Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code provided the landlord complies with the provisions of Section 1954.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   (SB 655)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.8.

(a) Subject to subdivision (e), for any structure intended for human habitation, it shall be the duty of a landlord to undertake one or both of the following actions as may be necessary to remediate any dilapidations that arise as a result of a disaster:

(1) Removal of debris caused by the disaster.

(2) Mitigation of hazards arising from the disaster, including, but not limited to, the presence of mold, smoke, smoke residue, smoke odor, ash, asbestos, or water damage.

(b) Until a determination has been made by a local public health agency or official that the debris from the disaster, including, but not limited to, ash, sludge, or runoff, does not contain toxic substances, the presence of the debris at
 a rental unit shall be presumed to render the
 rental unit untenantable pursuant to Section 1941.1.

(c) The landlord shall comply with subdivision (a) within a reasonable time after the property sustains damage, and shall follow any and all cleaning protocols issued by government officials, including contracting with licensed
 remediation companies where required. If the tenant has provided the landlord with a postal or email address, the landlord shall notify the tenant in writing that the landlord has complied with subdivision (a) and that the tenant may view and, if
 requested, obtain copies of any environmental studies, testing, or reports conducted.

(d) Unless
 lawfully terminated by either party, the tenancy shall remain in effect and the tenant shall have the right to return to the rental unit at the same rental rate in effect immediately prior to the disaster as soon as it is safe and practicable.

(e) Nothing in this section shall require a landlord to rebuild a residential rental property or any portion thereof that has sustained damage as a result of a disaster.

(f) The rights, obligations, and remedies under this section are cumulative and in addition to any other rights, obligations, or remedies available under federal, state, or local law.

(g) Nothing in this section preempts any local ordinance from providing for additional protections for tenants or imposing additional obligations on the landlord.

(h) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means a natural or manmade emergency resulting from an earthquake, flood, fire, riot, storm, drought, plant or animal infestation or disease, pandemic or epidemic disease outbreak, or other natural or manmade disaster for which a state of
 emergency has been declared by the President of the United States or the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.   (SB 610)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.9.

(a) (1) When the hiring of residential real property is terminated pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 1932 or paragraph (4) of Section 1933, the landlord shall return to the tenant any advance rental payments made by the tenant that cover any period after the date of the termination.

(2) Any payment from the landlord to the tenant required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be made within 21 days of the date of the termination and shall be sent to the address provided by the tenant. If the hirer does not provide an address, mailings pursuant to this subdivision shall be sent to the address of the unit that was the subject of the terminated
 hiring.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the date of the termination shall be either of the following, as applicable:

(A) The date that the tenant informs the landlord or the landlord’s agent of the tenant’s intent to terminate the hiring pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 1932.

(B) The date that the residential real property was destroyed, if the termination happened pursuant to paragraph (4) of Section 1933.

(b) During any period during which a tenant in residential real property is unable to occupy their rental unit due to a mandatory evacuation order pursuant to a disaster, as defined in Section
 1941.8, the tenant’s obligation to pay rent shall be discharged for the period during which the tenant must be evacuated. If the tenant already paid rent for the period of an evacuation, the landlord shall return the rent within 10 calendar days after the evacuation order is lifted or the tenant may deduct the amount from the next month’s rent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 547, Sec. 3.   (SB 610)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.

(a) If within a reasonable time after written or oral notice to the landlord or his agent, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1962, of dilapidations rendering the premises untenantable which the landlord ought to repair, the landlord neglects to do so, the tenant may repair the same himself where the cost of such repairs does not require an expenditure more than one month’s rent of the premises and deduct the expenses of such repairs from the rent when due, or the tenant may vacate the premises, in which case the tenant shall be discharged from further payment of rent, or performance of other
conditions as of the date of vacating the premises. This remedy shall not be available to the tenant more than twice in any 12-month period.

(b) For the purposes of this section, if a tenant acts to repair and deduct after the 30th day following notice, he is presumed to have acted after a reasonable time. The presumption established by this subdivision is a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence and shall not be construed to prevent a tenant from repairing and deducting after a shorter notice if all the circumstances require shorter notice.

(c) The tenant’s remedy under subdivision (a) shall not be available if the condition was caused by the violation of Section 1929 or 1941.2.

(d) The remedy provided by this section is in addition to any other remedy provided by this chapter, the rental
agreement, or other applicable statutory or common law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 307.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.1.

Any agreement by a lessee of a dwelling waiving or modifying his rights under Section 1941 or 1942 shall be void as contrary to public policy with respect to any condition which renders the premises untenantable, except that the lessor and the lessee may agree that the lessee shall undertake to improve, repair or maintain all or stipulated portions of the dwelling as part of the consideration for rental.

The lessor and lessee may, if an agreement is in writing, set forth the provisions of Sections 1941 to 1942.1, inclusive, and provide that any controversy relating to a condition of
the premises claimed to make them untenantable may by application of either party be submitted to arbitration, pursuant to the provisions of Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280), Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and that the costs of such arbitration shall be apportioned by the arbitrator between the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1280.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.2.

A tenant who has made a payment to a utility pursuant to Section 777, 777.1, 10009, 10009.1, 12822, 12822.1, 16481, or 16481.1 of the Public Utilities Code, or to a district pursuant to Section 60371 of the Government Code, may deduct the payment from the rent as provided in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 6.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.3.

(a) In any unlawful detainer action by the landlord to recover possession from a tenant, a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence that the landlord has breached the habitability requirements in Section 1941 is created if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The dwelling substantially lacks any of the affirmative standard characteristics listed in Section 1941.1, is deemed and declared substandard pursuant to Section 17920.3 of the Health
and Safety Code, or contains lead hazards as defined in Section 17920.10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A public officer or employee who is responsible for the enforcement of any housing law has notified the landlord, or an agent of the landlord, in a written notice issued after inspection of the premises which informs the landlord of his or her obligation to abate the nuisance or repair the substandard or unsafe conditions identified under the authority described in paragraph (1).

(3) The conditions have existed and have not been abated 60 days beyond the date of issuance of the notice specified in paragraph (2) and the delay is without good cause.

(4) The conditions were not caused by an act or omission of the tenant or lessee in violation of Section 1929 or 1941.2.

(b) The presumption specified in subdivision (a) does not arise unless all of the conditions set forth therein are proven, but failure to so establish the presumption shall not otherwise affect the right of the tenant to raise and pursue any defense based on the landlord’s breach of the implied warranty of habitability.

(c) The presumption provided in this section shall apply only to rental agreements or leases entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 595, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.4.

(a) A landlord of a dwelling may not demand rent, collect rent, issue a notice of a rent increase, or issue a three-day notice to pay rent or quit pursuant to subdivision (2) of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if all of the following conditions exist prior to the landlord’s demand or notice:

(1) The dwelling substantially lacks any of the affirmative standard characteristics listed in Section 1941.1 or violates Section 17920.10 of the Health and Safety Code,
or is deemed and declared substandard as set forth in Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code because conditions listed in that section exist to an extent that endangers the life, limb, health, property, safety, or welfare of the public or the occupants of the dwelling.

(2) A public officer or employee who is responsible for the enforcement of any housing law, after inspecting the premises, has notified the landlord or the landlord’s agent in writing of his or her obligations to abate the nuisance or repair the substandard conditions.

(3) The conditions have existed and have not been abated 35 days beyond the date of service of the notice specified in paragraph (2) and the delay is without good cause. For purposes of this subdivision, service shall be complete at the time of deposit in the United States mail.

(4) The conditions were not caused by an act or omission of the tenant or lessee in violation of Section 1929 or 1941.2.

(b) (1) A landlord who violates this section is liable to the tenant or lessee for the actual damages sustained by the tenant or lessee and special damages of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) The prevailing party shall be entitled to recovery of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of the suit in an amount fixed by the court.

(c) Any court that awards damages under this section may also order the landlord to abate any nuisance at the rental dwelling and to repair any substandard conditions of the rental dwelling, as defined in Section 1941.1, which significantly or materially affect the health or safety of the occupants of
the rental dwelling and are uncorrected. If the court orders repairs or corrections, or both, the court’s jurisdiction continues over the matter for the purpose of ensuring compliance.

(d) The tenant or lessee shall be under no obligation to undertake any other remedy prior to exercising his or her rights under this section.

(e) Any action under this section may be maintained in small claims court if the claim does not exceed the jurisdictional limit of that court.

(f) The remedy provided by this section may be utilized in addition to any other remedy provided by this chapter, the rental agreement, lease, or other applicable statutory or common law. Nothing in this section shall require any landlord to comply with this section if he or she pursues his or her rights pursuant to Chapter 12.75 (commencing with Section
7060) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.5.

(a) If the lessor retaliates against the lessee because of the exercise by the lessee of the lessee’s rights under this chapter or because of the lessee’s complaint to an appropriate agency as to tenantability of a dwelling, and if the lessee of a dwelling is not in default as to the payment of rent, the lessor may not recover possession of a dwelling in any action or proceeding, cause the lessee to quit involuntarily, increase the rent, or decrease any services within 180 days of any of the following:

(1) After the date upon which the lessee, in good faith, has given notice pursuant to Section 1942, has provided notice of a suspected bed bug infestation, or has made an oral complaint to the lessor regarding tenantability.

(2) After the date upon which the lessee, in good faith, has filed a written complaint, or an oral complaint which is registered or otherwise recorded in writing, with an appropriate agency, of which the lessor has notice, for the purpose of obtaining correction of a condition relating to tenantability.

(3) After the date of an inspection or issuance of a citation, resulting from a complaint described in paragraph (2) of which the lessor did not have notice.

(4) After the filing of appropriate documents commencing a judicial or arbitration proceeding involving the issue of tenantability.

(5) After entry of judgment or the signing of an arbitration award, if any, when in the judicial proceeding or arbitration the issue of tenantability is determined
 adversely to the lessor.

In each instance, the 180-day period shall run from the latest applicable date referred to in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive.

(b) A lessee may not invoke subdivision (a) more than once in any 12-month period.

(c) To report, or to threaten to report, the lessee or individuals known to the landlord to be associated with the lessee to immigration authorities is a form of retaliatory conduct prohibited under subdivision (a). This subdivision shall in no way limit the definition of retaliatory conduct prohibited under this section.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), it is unlawful for a lessor to increase rent, decrease services, cause a lessee to quit involuntarily, bring an action to recover possession, or threaten to do any of those acts, for the
 purpose of retaliating against the lessee because the lessee has lawfully organized or participated in a lessees’ association or an organization advocating lessees’ rights or has lawfully and peaceably exercised any rights under the law. In an action brought by or against the lessee pursuant to this subdivision, the lessee shall bear the burden of producing evidence that the lessor’s conduct was, in fact, retaliatory.

(e) To report, or to threaten to report, the lessee or individuals known to the landlord to be associated with the lessee to immigration authorities is a form of retaliatory conduct prohibited under subdivision (d). This subdivision shall in no way limit the definition of retaliatory conduct prohibited under this section.

(f) This section does not limit in any way the exercise by the lessor of the lessor’s rights under any lease or agreement or any law pertaining to
 the hiring of property or the lessor’s right to do any of the acts described in subdivision (a) or (d) for any lawful cause. Any waiver by a lessee of the lessee’s rights under this section is void as contrary to public policy.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, a lessor may recover possession of a dwelling and do any of the other acts described in subdivision (a) within the period or periods prescribed therein, or within subdivision (d), if the notice of termination, rent increase, or other act, and any pleading or statement of issues in an arbitration, if any, states the ground upon which the lessor, in good faith, seeks to recover possession, increase rent, or do any of the other acts described in subdivision (a) or (d). If the statement is controverted, the lessor shall establish its truth at the trial or other hearing.

(h) Any lessor or agent of a lessor
 who violates this section shall be liable to the lessee in a civil action for all of the following:

(1) The actual damages sustained by the lessee.

(2) Punitive damages in an amount of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each retaliatory act where the lessor or agent has been guilty of fraud, oppression, or malice with respect to that act.

(i) In any action brought for damages for retaliatory eviction, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party if either party requests attorney’s fees upon the initiation of the action.

(j) The remedies provided by this section shall be in addition to any other remedies provided by statutory or decisional law.

(k) A lessor does not violate subdivision (c) or (e) by complying with any legal obligation under any federal government program that provides for rent limitations or rental assistance to a qualified tenant.

(l) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2021.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 2, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 27, Sec. 5.   (AB 832)   Effective June 28, 2021.   Operative October 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.6.

Any person entering onto residential real property, upon the invitation of an occupant, during reasonable hours or because of emergency circumstances, for the purpose of providing information regarding tenants’ rights or to participate in a lessees’ association or association of tenants or an association that advocates tenants’ rights shall not be liable in any criminal or civil action for trespass.

The Legislature finds and declares that this section is declaratory of existing law. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to enlarge or diminish the rights of any person under existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.7.

(a) A person or corporation that occupies, owns, manages, or provides services in connection with any real property, including the individual’s or corporation’s agents or successors in interest, and that allows an animal on the premises, shall not do any of the following:

(1) Advertise, through any means, the availability of real property for occupancy in a manner designed to discourage application
for occupancy of that real property because an applicant’s animal has not been declawed or devocalized.

(2) Refuse to allow the occupancy of any real property, refuse to negotiate the occupancy of any real property, or otherwise make unavailable or deny to any other person the occupancy of any real property because of that person’s refusal to declaw or devocalize any animal.

(3) Require any tenant or occupant of real property to declaw or devocalize any animal allowed on the premises.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Animal” means any mammal, bird, reptile, or amphibian.

(2) “Application for occupancy” means all phases of the process of applying for
the right to occupy real property, including, but not limited to, filling out applications, interviewing, and submitting references.

(3) “Claw” means a hardened keratinized modification of the epidermis, or a hardened keratinized growth, that extends from the end of the digits of certain mammals, birds, reptiles, and amphibians, often commonly referred to as a “claw,” “talon,” or “nail.”

(4) “Declawing” means performing, procuring, or arranging for any procedure, such as an onychectomy, tendonectomy, or phalangectomy, to remove or to prevent the normal function of an animal’s claw or claws.

(5) “Devocalizing” means performing, procuring, or arranging for any surgical procedure such as a vocal cordectomy, to remove an animal’s vocal cords or to prevent the normal function of an animal’s vocal cords.

(6) “Owner” means any person who has any right, title, or interest in real property.

(c) (1) A city attorney, district attorney, or other law enforcement prosecutorial entity has standing to enforce this section and may sue for declaratory relief or injunctive relief for a violation of this section, and to enforce the civil penalties provided in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) In addition to any other penalty allowed by law, a violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall result in a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per advertisement, to be paid to the entity that is authorized to bring the action under this section.

(3) In addition to any other penalty allowed by law, a violation of paragraph (2) or (3)
of subdivision (a) shall result in a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per animal, to be paid to the entity that is authorized to bring the action under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 596, Sec. 2.   (SB 1229)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.8.

(a) For any residential tenancy commenced, renewed, or continuing on a month-to-month or other periodic basis, on or after January 1, 2026, a
 landlord or their agent shall allow the tenant to opt out of paying for any subscription from a third-party internet service provider, such as through a bulk-billing arrangement, to provide service for wired internet, cellular, or satellite service that is offered in connection with the tenancy.

(b) A landlord or their agent shall not retaliate against a tenant for exercising the
 tenant’s rights under this section, consistent with the protections provided in Section 1942.5.

(c) If the landlord or their agent violates subdivision (a), the tenant may deduct the cost of the subscription to the third-party internet service provider from the rent.

(d) This section does not prevent a
 landlord or their agent from offering bulk-billing arrangements to their tenants.

(e) For the purposes of this section, 
 “internet service provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 3100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 506, Sec. 1.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a landlord shall not, with respect to a tenant who has COVID-19 rental debt, as that term is defined in Section 1179.02 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and who has submitted a declaration of COVID-19-related financial distress, as defined in Section 1179.02 of the Code of Civil Procedure, do either of the following:

(1) Charge a tenant, or attempt to collect from a tenant, fees assessed for the late payment of that COVID-19 rental debt.

(2) Increase fees charged to the tenant or charge the tenant fees for services previously provided by the landlord without charge.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a landlord who temporarily reduces or makes unavailable a service or amenity as the result of compliance with federal, state, or local public health orders or guidelines shall not be considered to have violated the rental or lease agreement, nor to have provided different terms or conditions of
 tenancy or reduced services for purposes of any law, ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure adopted by a local governmental entity that establishes a maximum amount that a landlord may charge a tenant for rent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 5, Sec. 6.   (AB 81)   Effective February 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1943.

A hiring of real property, other than lodgings and dwelling-houses, in places where there is no custom or usage on the subject, is presumed to be a month to month tenancy unless otherwise designated in writing; except that, in the case of real property used for agricultural or grazing purposes a hiring is presumed to be for one year from its commencement unless otherwise expressed in the hiring.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1541.)
-------------------------------------------

1944.

A hiring of lodgings or a dwelling house for an unspecified term is presumed to have been made for such length of time as the parties adopt for the estimation of the rent. Thus a hiring at a monthly rate of rent is presumed to be for one month. In the absence of any agreement respecting the length of time or the rent, the hiring is presumed to be monthly.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1945.

If a lessee of real property remains in possession thereof after the expiration of the hiring, and the lessor accepts rent from him, the parties are presumed to have renewed the hiring on the same terms and for the same time, not exceeding one month when the rent is payable monthly, nor in any case one year.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1945.5.
